Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1419.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6114(b)(1) introductory paragraph, (3) and (6) of Title 23 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended and the subsection is amended by adding paragraphs to read:§ 6114. Contempt for violation of order or agreement.* * *(b) Trial and punishment.--(1) [A sentence for contempt under this chapter may include:] A defendant who is found in contempt under this chapter and was not previously found in contempt under this chapter commits a misdemeanor for which the defendant may be sentenced to:* * *123456789101112131415161718 (1.1) A defendant who is found in contempt under this chapter and was previously found in contempt under this chapter on one occasion commits a misdemeanor of the third degree for which the minimum fine shall be $500.(1.2) A defendant who is found in contempt under this chapter and was previously found in contempt under this chapter on two occasions commits a misdemeanor of the second degree for which the minimum fine shall be $500.(1.3) A defendant who is found in contempt under this chapter and was previously found in contempt under this chapter on three or more occasions commits a misdemeanor of the first degree for which the minimum fine shall be $500.* * *(3) [The defendant shall not have a right to a jury trial on a charge of indirect criminal contempt. However, the defendant shall be entitled to counsel.] For a first charge of contempt under this chapter, the defendant:(i) Shall not have the right to a jury trial.(ii) Shall be entitled to counsel.* * *(6) The minimum fine required by subsection (b)(1), (1.1), (1.2) or (1.3) allocated pursuant to subsection (b)(2)(i) and (iii) shall be used to supplement and not to supplant any other source of funds received for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1419PN1643 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627